District of Columbia statutes.
7-2341.20

Advertising.

(a)

No person, entity, or government agency shall advertise or disseminate information to the public that it offers ambulance service, unless that service is provided by persons certified pursuant to this chapter and to rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter at a level equal to or greater than a basic emergency medical technician.

(b)

No person, entity, or government agency shall advertise or disseminate information to the public that it offers emergency medical services training, unless that training is provided by persons certified as emergency medical services instructors pursuant to this chapter and to rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-357, § 21, 56 DCR 1167